el: Τρόποι φιλτραρίσματος: Αυτόματη λειτουργία; Λειτουργία πόλης; Λειτουργία φίλτρου; Κλείδωμα GPS; Λειτουργία αυτοκινητόδρομου; Τμηματοποίηση ζώνης Ka; TSR; Άλλο
sk-SK: Režimy filtrovania: Automatický režim; Mestský režim; Režim filtra; Uzamknutie GPS; Diaľničný režim; Ka-pásmová segmentácia; TSR; Iné
cs: Režimy filtrování: Automatický režim; Městský režim; Režim filtru; Uzamčení GPS; Dálniční režim; Segmentace pásma Ka; TSR; Jiné
sl-SI: Načini filtriranja: Samodejni način; Mestni način; Način filtra; GPS zaklepanja; Avtocestni način; Ka-band segmentacija; TSR; Drugo
tr: Filtreleme Modları: Otomatik mod; Şehir modu; Filtre modu; GPS kilitlenmeleri; Otoyol modu; Ka bandı segmentasyonu; TSR; Diğer
ja: フィルタリングモード: オートモード; シティモード; フィルターモード; GPSロックアウト; ハイウェイモード; Kaバンドセグメンテーション; TSR; その他
th: โหมดการกรอง: โหมดอัตโนมัติ; โหมดเมือง; โหมดตัวกรอง; การล็อก GPS; โหมดทางหลวง; การแบ่งคลื่นความถี่ Ka-band; TSR; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 濾器模式: 自動模式; 城市模式; 過濾模式; GPS 鎖定; 高速公路模式; Ka 波段分割; TSR; 其他
nb: Filtreringsmoduser: Automodus; Bymodus; Filtermodus; GPS-sperringer; Motorveimodus; Ka-båndsegmentering; TSR; Annet
ru: Режимы работы: Автоматический режим; Городской режим; Режим фильтра; Блокировки GPS; Режим шоссе; Сегментация Ka-диапазона; TSR; Другой
vi: Kiểu lọc: Chế độ tự động; Chế độ thành thị; Chế độ lọc; Loại trừ theo GPS; Chế độ đường cao tốc; Phân đoạn băng tần Ka; TSR; Khác
da: Filtreringstilstande: Auto-tilstand; Bytilstand; Filtertilstand; GPS-låse; Motorvejstilstand; Ka-bånd-segmentering; TSR; Andet
zh-CN: 过滤模式: 自动模式; 城市模式; 滤镜模式; GPS 锁定; 高速公路模式; Ka 波段分割; TSR; 其他
ro-RO: Moduri de filtrare: Mod auto; Mod oraș; Mod de filtrare; Blocări GPS; Mod autostradă; Segmentarea în bandă Ka; TSR; Altele
es: Modos de filtrado: Modo automático; Modo ciudad; Modo filtro; Bloqueos de GPS; Modo autopista; Segmentación en banda Ka; TSR; Otros
pl: Tryby filtrowania: Tryb automatyczny; Tryb miejski; Tryb filtra; Blokady GPS; Tryb autostrady; Segmentacja pasma Ka; TSR; Inne
sv: Filtreringslägen: Autoläge; Stadsläge; Filterläge; GPS-lås; Motorvägsläge; Ka-bandssegmentering; TSR; Övrigt
hr-HR: Načini filtriranja: Automatski način rada; Gradski način rada; Način rada s filtrom; GPS zaključavanja; Način rada za autocestu; Segmentacija Ka-pojasa; TSR; Ostalo
nl: Filtermodi: Automatische modus; Stadsmodus; Filtermodus; GPS-vergrendeling; Snelwegmodus; Ka-bandsegmentatie; Verkeersbordherkenning; Andere
en: Filtering modes: Auto mode; City mode; Filter mode; GPS lockouts; Highway mode; Ka-band segmentation; TSR; Other
it: Modalità di filtraggio: Modalità automatica; Modalità città; Modalità filtro; Blocchi GPS; Modalità autostrada; Segmentazione in banda Ka; TSR; Altro
lt-LT: Filtravimo režimai: Automatinis režimas; Miesto režimas; Filtro režimas; GPS blokavimas; Greitkelio režimas; Ka-juostos segmentavimas; TSR; Kita
fr: Modes de filtrage: Mode automatique; Mode ville; Mode filtre; Verrouillages GPS; Mode autoroute; Segmentation en bande Ka; TSR; Autre
ko: 필터링 모드: 자동 모드; 도시 모드; 필터 모드; GPS 록아웃; 고속도로 모드; Ka밴드 분할; TSR; 기타
de: Filtermodi: Automatikmodus; Stadtmodus; Filtermodus; GPS-Sperren; Autobahnmodus; Ka-Band-Segmentierung; TSR; Sonstiges
fi: Suodatustilat: Automaattinen tila; Kaupunkitila; Suodatintila; GPS-lukitus; Moottoritietila; Ka-kaistan segmentointi; TSR; Muu
pt-PT: Modos de filtragem: Modo automático; Modo cidade; Modo de filtro; Bloqueios de GPS; Modo de autoestrada; Segmentação de banda Ka; TSR; Outro
pt-BR: Modos de filtragem: Modo automático; Modo cidade; Modo do filtro; Bloqueios de GPS; Modo rodovia; Segmentação de banda Ka; TSR; Outro
bg-BG: Режими на филтриране: Автоматичен режим; Градски режим; Режим на филтриране; GPS блокировки; Режим на магистрала; Сегментиране на Ka-лента; TSR; Други
hu: Szűrési módok: Automatikus mód; Város mód; Szűrő mód; GPS kizárása; Autópálya mód; Ka-sáv szegmentáció; TSR; Egyéb